Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 41 Redomestication Model Act

Editor's notes. —

This chapter was enacted as chapter 39. As Laws 1989, ch. 246, also enacted a chapter 39, this chapter has been redesignated as chapter 41. See, also, chapter 40 and notes thereto.

§ 26-41-101.
Approval as a domestic insurer.

Any insurer which is organized under the laws of any jurisdiction other than this state and is admitted to do business in this state for the purpose of writing insurance may become a domestic insurer by meeting the substantive requirements of law relative to the organization and licensing of a domestic insurer of the same type, by designating its principal place of business at a place in this state, and by receiving from the commissioner certification that it is a domestic insurer as if originally formed in the state. The domesticated insurer thereafter will be entitled to domestic certificates and licenses to transact business in this state, and shall be subject to the authority and jurisdiction of this state as a domestic insurer.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 74, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-39-101

.

§ 26-41-102.
Conversion to foreign insurer.

Any domestic insurer may, upon the approval of the commissioner, transfer its domicile to any other state in which it is admitted to transact the business of insurance, and upon such a transfer shall cease to be a domestic insurer, and shall be admitted to this state if qualified as a foreign insurer. The commissioner shall approve any proposed transfer unless he shall determine the transfer is not in the interest of the policyholders of this state.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 74, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-39-102

.

§ 26-41-103.
Effects of redomestication.

The certificate of authority, agent appointments and licenses, rates, and other items which the commissioner of insurance allows, in his discretion, which are in existence at the time any insurer licensed to transact the business of insurance in this state transfers its corporate domicile to this or any other state by merger, consolidation, continuance, transfer or any other lawful method shall continue in full force and effect upon the transfer if the insurer remains duly qualified to transact the business of insurance in this state. All outstanding policies of any transferring insurer shall remain in full force and effect and need not be endorsed as to the new name of the company or its new location unless so ordered by the commissioner. Every transferring insurer shall file new policy forms with the commissioner on or before the effective date of the transfer, but may use existing policy forms with appropriate endorsements if allowed by, and under conditions approved by, the commissioner.

The procedures for filing and approval of articles of domestication by the corporate directors shall be the same as those set forth in W.S.

26-24-104

concerning the filing and approval of articles of incorporation for proposed domestic insurers.

The articles of domestication of any insurer transferring its domicile into this state shall be deemed the articles of incorporation of the insurer. The domestication of an insurer into this state shall have the same effect upon the insurer as in the case of a corporation continuing in Wyoming pursuant to W.S.

17-16-1810

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 74, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-39-103

; Laws 1990, ch. 7, § 1.

Cited

in

Wyoming Ins. Guar. Ass'n v. Allstate Indem. Co., 844 P.2d 464,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 199

(Wyo. 1992).